Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1088.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 8-101, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 8-101. A. Any student residing in a school district
that does not offer the grade which the student is entitled to
pursue shall be allowed to transfer to a school district inside or
outside of the transportation area in which is adjacent to the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1088 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

scho ol district where the student resides which and offers the grade
the student is entitled to pursue. The district to which the
student transfers shall be referred to as the receiving district.
B. A student shall be limited to one transfer pursuant to
subsection A of this section, which shall be automatically approved
and not subject to capacity requirements provided in Section 8-101.2
of this title. Thereafter, a student may apply for any other kind
of transfer for which the student is eligible as provided for in the
Education Open Transfer Act.
C. Any student residing in a school district that does not
offer the grade which the student is entitled to pursue and who
chooses not to attend a school district which is adjacent to the
school district where the student resides pursuant to subsection A
of this section, shall follow the requirements of Section 8-101.2 of
this title to request a transfer to another school district which
offers the grade the student is entitled to pursue.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 8-101.2, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 193, O.S.L. 2022 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 8-101.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 8-101.2. A. Except as provided in subsection B of this
section, on and after January 1, 2022, the transfer of a student
from the district in which the student resides to another school
district furnishing instruction in the grade the student is entitled
to pursue shall be granted at any time in the year unless the number
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1088 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

of t ransfers exceeds the capacity of a grade level for each school
site within a school district. If the capacity of a grade level for
each school site within a school district is insufficient to enroll
all eligible students, the school district shall select transfer
students in the order in which the district received the student
transfer applications. The capacity of a school district shall be
determined by the school district board of education based on its
policy adopted pursuant to subsection B of this section. A student
may be granted a one-year transfer and may automatically continue to
attend the school each school year to which the student transferred
with the approval of the receiving district. At the end of each
school year, a school district may deny continued transfer of the
student for the reasons outlined in paragraphs 1 and 2 of subsection
B of this section. Any brother or sister of a student who transfers
may attend the school district to which the student transferred, if
the school district policy gives preference to sibling transfers
regardless of capacity, and the brother or sister of the transferred
student does not meet a basis for denial as outlined in paragraphs 1
and 2 of subsection B of this section. Any child in the custody of
the Department of Human Services in foster care who is living in the
home of a student who transfers may attend the school district to
which the student transferred. Except for a child in the custody of
the Department of Human Services in foster care, a transfer student
shall not transfer more than two (2) times per school year to one or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1088 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

more school districts in which the student does not reside, provided
that the student may always reenroll at any time in his or her
school district of residence. At the discretion of the receiving
district, a student who has attended a school district as a resident
student for at least three (3) years prior to becoming eligible to
apply as a transfer student may be allowed to transfer to the school
district regardless of capacity.
If the grade a student is entitled to pursue is not offered in
the district where the student resides, the transfer shall be
automatically approved.
B. Each school district board of education shall adopt a policy
to determine the number of transfer students the school district has
the capacity to accept in each grade level for each school site
within a school district no later than January 1, 2022. The policy
may include:
1. The acts and reasons outlined in Section 24-101.3 of this
title as a basis for denial of a transfer; and
2. A history of absences as a basis for denial of a transfer.
For the purposes of this section, "history of absences" means ten or
more absences in one semester that are not excused for the reasons
provided for in subsection B of Section 10-105 of this title or due
to illness.
The policy shall be publicly posted on the school district
website.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1088 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. By the first day of January, April, July and October, the
school district board of education shall establish the number of
transfer students the school district has the capacity to accept in
each grade level for each school site within a school district.
D. After establishing the number of transfer students the
school district has the capacity to accept in each grade level for
each school site within a school district, the board of education
shall:
1. Publish in a prominent place on the school district website
the number of transfer students for each grade level for each school
site within a school district which the school district has the
capacity to accept; and
2. Report to the State Department of Education the number of
transfer students for each grade level for each school site within a
school district which the school district has the capacity to
accept.
E. If a transfer request is denied by the school district, the
parent of the student may appeal the denial within ten (10) days of
notification of the denial to the receiving school district board of
education. The receiving school district board of education shall
consider the appeal at its next regularly scheduled board meeting.
If the receiving school district board of education denies the
appeal, the parent of the student may appeal the denial within ten
(10) days of notification of the appeal denial to the State Board of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1088 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Educ ation. The parent shall submit to the State Board of Education
and the superintendent of the receiving school a notice of appeal on
a form prescribed by the State Board of Education. The appeal shall
be considered by the State Board of Education at its next regularly
scheduled meeting, where the parent and a representative from the
receiving school district may address the Board. The State Board of
Education shall promulgate rules to establish the appeals process
authorized by this subsection.
F. Each school district board of education shall submit to the
State Department of Education the number of student transfers
approved and denied and whether each denial was based on capacity,
acts and reasons outlined in Section 24-101.3 of this title or a
history of absences as provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection B
of this section. The State Department of Education shall publish
the data on its website and make the data available to the Office of
Educational Quality and Accountability.
G. Each year, the Office of Educational Quality and
Accountability shall randomly select ten percent (10%) of the school
districts in the state and conduct an audit of each district's
approved and denied transfers based on the provisions of the
policies adopted by the respective school district board of
education. If the Office finds inaccurate reporting of capacity
levels by a school district, the Office shall set the capacity for
the school district.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1088 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
April 22, 2025 - DO PASS






















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1088 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)